Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14A-110] Premium rates,
determination. (a) The board shall establish the premium rates to be
charged for insurance sold by the company. The company shall comply with the
requirements set forth in article 14 of this chapter. Premium rates shall be
set at levels sufficient, when invested, to carry all claims to maturity, to
meet the reasonable expenses for administering the company, and to maintain a
reasonable surplus.

(b) The board shall hire a qualified actuary
to assist with the development of sound premium rates. [L 1996, c 261, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next